Washington statutes.
RCW 2.72.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agent" means a person granted authority to act for a principal under a power of attorney.

(2) "Contract service provider" means a public guardian or public conservator providing services under contract with the office of public guardianship and conservatorship. Any public guardian or public conservator providing such services must be certified by the certified professional guardian [guardianship] board established by the supreme court.

(3) "Decision-making assistance" means support for an individual with diminished decision-making ability in making decisions affecting health or safety or to manage financial affairs. Assistance includes, without limitation, acting as a representative payee, an agent, a trustee, a public guardian, or a public conservator.

(4) "Estate administration" means services provided for a fee to the estate of an individual who died at age eighteen or older, in circumstances where a contract service provider is granted letters under RCW 11.28.120(7).

(5) "Long-term care services" means services provided through the department of social and health services either in a hospital or skilled nursing facility, or in another setting under a home and community-based waiver authorized under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n.

(6) "Office" means the office of public guardianship and conservatorship.

(7) "Public conservator" means an individual or entity appointed by a court to make decisions with respect to property or financial affairs of an individual subject to conservatorship, and who provides these services under contract with the office of public guardianship and conservatorship.

(8) "Public guardian" means an individual or entity appointed by the court to make decisions with respect to the personal affairs of an individual, and who provides these services under contract with the office of public guardianship and conservatorship.

(9) "Representative payee" means the designated agent for a recipient of government benefits whom a government agency has determined to be incapable of managing his or her benefits.

(10) "Trustee" means a person or organization named in a trust agreement to handle trust property for the benefit of one or more beneficiaries in accordance with the terms of the agreement.

[ 2020 c 312 s 402. Prior: 2019 c 215 s 2; 2007 c 364 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.